Utah statutes.
10-3-828.   Oath -- Filing.
The oath of office required under this part shall be administered by any
judge,  notary public, or by the recorder of the municipality.  Elected
officials shall take their oath of office at 12:00 noon on the first Monday in
January following their election or as soon thereafter as is practical.
Appointed officers shall take their oath at any time before entering on their
duties.  All oaths of office shall be filed with the recorder of the
respective municipality.
